en: Beef from Bazas
fr: Bœuf de Bazas

en: Beef from Chalosse
fr: Bœuf de Chalosse, Boeuf de Chalosse

en: Beef from Charolles
fr: Bœuf de Charolles

en: Beef from Vendée
fr: Bœuf de Vendée, Boeuf de Vendée

en: Beef from Maine
fr: Bœuf du Maine

en: Cooked beef meat
fr: Viande de boeuf cuite
hr: Kuhano goveđe meso
lt: Kepta jautienos mėsa

en: Smoked cooked beef meat
fr: Viande de boeuf fumée cuite, viande de bœuf fumée cuite

en: Roasted horse meat, Baked horse meat
fr: Viande de cheval rôtie, Viande de cheval cuite au four
hr: Pečeno konjsko meso
lt: Kepta arkliena, Skrudinta arkliena

en: Grilled horse topside, Pan-fried horse topside
fr: Tende de cheval grillée, Tende de cheval poêlée

en: Grilled horse sirloin steak, Pan-fried horse sirloin steak
fr: Faux-filet de cheval grillé, Faux-filet de cheval poêlé

en: Grilled horse rib steak, Pan-fried horse rib steak
fr: Entrecôte de cheval grillée, Entrecôté de cheval poêlée

en: Roasted horse sirloin steak, Baked horse sirloin steak
fr: Faux-filet de cheval rôti, Faux-filet de cheval cuit au four

en: Roasted horse topside, Baked horse topside
fr: Tende de cheval rôtie, Tende de cheval cuite au four

en: Cooked white meat
fr: Viande blanche cuite
hr: Kuhano bijelo meso
lt: Kepta balta mėsa

en: Cooked red meat
fr: Viande rouge cuite
hr: Kuhano crveno meso
lt: Kepta raudona mėsa

en: Beef bacon
fr: Bacon de boeuf
hr: Goveđa slanina
lt: Jautienos bekonas
zh: 牛肉培根

en: Beef tongues, Beef tongue
de: Rinderzungen
fi: naudan kielet
fr: Langues de bœuf, Langue de bœuf
hr: Goveđi jezici
it: Lingue di bue
ja: 牛タン
lt: Jautienos liežuvis
nl: Rundertong

en: Cooked beef tongue
fr: Langue de boeuf cuite
hr: Kuhani goveđi jezik
lt: Keptas jautienos liežuvis

en: Beef knuckle
fr: Jarret de boeuf
hr: Goveđa koljenica
ja: カメノコ
lt: Jautienos kulšelės

en: Boiled beef knuckle, Beef knuckle cooked in water
fr: Jarret de boeuf bouilli, Jarret de boeuf cuit à l'eau
hr: Kuhana goveđa koljenica
lt: Virtos jautienos kulšelės